Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XIII.] PREFERENCE FOR OIL PRODUCTS

WITH
GREATER RECYCLED CONTENT

[§103D-1301] Short title. This part
shall be referred to as the "Recycled Oil Act". [L 1999, c 53, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next